Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 3. Descent, Omitted Issue, and Lapsed Legacies

§ 331.
Degrees; how computed: kindred of half-blood.

Kindred of the half-blood shall inherit the same share they would inherit if they were of the whole blood.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 332.
Share of afterborn child.

When a child of a testator is born after the making of a will and provision is not made in the will for that child, he or she shall have the same share in the estate of the testator as if the testator had died intestate unless it is apparent from the will that it was the intention of the testator that provision should not be made for the child.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 333.
Share of child or descendant of child omitted from will.

When a testator omits to provide in the testator’s will for any child of the testator, or for the descendants of a deceased child, and it appears that the omission was made by mistake or accident, the child or descendants, as the case may be, shall have and be assigned the same share of the estate of the testator as if the testator had died intestate.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 334.
Afterborn and omitted child; from what part of estate share taken.

When a share of a testator’s estate is assigned to a child born after the making of a will, or to a child or the descendant of a child omitted in the will, the share shall be taken first from the estate not disposed of by the will, if there is any. If that is not sufficient, so much as is necessary shall be taken from the devisees or legatees in proportion to the value of the estate they respectively receive under the will. If the obvious intention of the testator, as to some specific devise, legacy, or other provision in the will, would thereby be defeated, the specific devise, legacy, or provision may be exempted from the apportionment and a different apportionment adopted in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 335.
Beneficiary dying before testator; descendants to take.

When a testamentary gift is made to a child or other kindred of the testator, and the designated beneficiary dies before the testator, leaving one or more descendants who survive the testator, the descendants shall take the gift that the designated beneficiary would have taken if the designated beneficiary had survived the testator, unless a different disposition is required by the will.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 336.
Individual absent and unheard of; share of estate.

If an individual entitled to a distributive share of the estate of a decedent is absent and unheard of for six years, two of which are after the death of the decedent, the court in which the decedent’s estate is pending may order the share of the absent individual distributed in accordance with the terms of the decedent’s will or the laws of intestacy as if the absent individual had not survived the decedent. If the absent individual proves to be alive, he or she shall be entitled to the share of the estate notwithstanding prior distribution, and may recover in an action on this statute any portion thereof that any other individual received under order. Before an order is made for the payment or distribution of any money or estate as authorized in this section, notice shall be given as provided by the Vermont Rules of Probate Procedure.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 337.
Requirement that individual survive decedent for 120 hours.

Except as provided in the decedent’s will, an individual who fails to survive the decedent by 120 hours is deemed to have predeceased the decedent for purposes of homestead allowance, exempt property, intestate succession, and taking under decedent’s will, and the decedent’s heirs and beneficiaries shall be determined accordingly. If it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that an individual who would otherwise be an heir or beneficiary survived the decedent by 120 hours, it is deemed that the individual failed to survive for the required period. This section is not to be applied if its application would result in escheat.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 338.
Distribution; order in which assets appropriated; abatement.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, shares of distributees given under a will abate, without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, in the following order:
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, shares of distributees given under a will abate, without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, in the following order:

property not disposed of by the will;

residuary devises and bequests;

general devises and bequests;

specific devises and bequests.

For purpose of abatement, a general devise or bequest charged on any specific property or fund is a specific devise or bequest to the extent of the value of the property on which it is charged, and upon the failure or insufficiency of the property on which it is charged, a general devise or bequest to the extent of the failure or insufficiency. Abatement within each classification is in proportion to the amounts of property each of the beneficiaries would have received if full distribution of the property had been made in accordance with the terms of the will.

If the will expresses an order of abatement or if the testamentary plan or the express or implied purpose of a devise or bequest would be defeated by the order of abatement listed in subsection (a) of this section, the shares of the distributees shall abate as may be necessary to give effect to the intention of the testator.

If the subject of a preferred devise or bequest is sold or used incident to administration, abatement shall be achieved by appropriate adjustments in, or contribution from, other interests in the remaining assets.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.